Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,369
Noise; restrictions.

No person shall sell, or offer for sale, a new motor vehicle with a gross vehicle weight of ten thousand pounds or more that produces a maximum noise exceeding a noise limit of 80dB(A) at a distance of fifty feet from the centerline of travel under test procedures established by section 60-6,372.

Laws 1972, LB 1360, § 7;

Laws 1979, LB 140, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-2207;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 465.